Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.200

Disposition of fees.

All moneys collected under the provisions of this chapter for the inspection and certification of any fruits or vegetables subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be handled and deposited in the manner provided for in chapter 15.17 RCW, as enacted or hereafter amended, for the handling of inspection and certification fees derived for the inspection of any fruits and vegetables.

[ 2011 c 103 s 2; 1961 c 29 s 20.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.